Mississippi, session 2026, SB2077.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 97-29-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 97-29-19.  (1)  Every person who shall remove the dead body of any human being from the grave or other place of interment for the purpose of selling the same or for mere wantonness, or who shall wantonly dig into or open the grave or other place of interment where the remains of any dead human body is interred, or wantonly disturb the remains of any dead human body therein interred, shall upon conviction be imprisoned in the Penitentiary not exceeding five (5) years or in the county jail not more than one (1) year, or be fined not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or both. (2)  Every person who shall sell the dead body of any human being or any part of the dead body of a human being shall upon conviction be imprisoned in the Penitentiary not exceeding five (5) years or in the county jail not more than one (1) year, or be fined not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or both. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.